Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4763.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 1 of chapter 141 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking out in lines 15 and 20 the words, “or security system”.
SECTION 2: Said section 1 of said chapter 141 is hereby further amended by striking
out the definition of “Security system.”
SECTION 3: Said section 1 of said chapter 141 is hereby further amended by striking
out in line 31, the word “security”.
SECTION 4: The board of state examiners of electricians shall update existing
regulations in accordance with this act.
of 1